DI-506
DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

DI3QN-01

DTC B0133/62 Short in P/T Squib (RH) Circuit (to B+)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The P/T squib (RH) circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and seat belt pretensioner (RH).

It causes the seat belt pretensioner (RH) to activate when the seat belt pretensioner (RH) activation condi-
tions are satisfied.

For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-2.

DTC B0133/62 is recorded when a B+ short is detected in the P/T squib (RH) circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

« Short circuit in seat belt pretensioner (RH) wire harness )
(to B+) * Seatbeltpretensioner (RH)

B0133/62 * Airb bl
/ * P/T squib (RH) malfunction "_' ag sensorassemoly
*Wire harness

* Airbag sensor assembly malfunction

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-493.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection. (See step 1 on page DI-549)

-

2 [ Check P/T squib (RH) circuit.

CHECK:
P/T Squib (RH) (@) Connectnegative ( -)terminal cabletothe battery, and

— 1= g‘irbag wait at least for 2 seconds.
Azggr(:bly (b) Turnignition switchto ON.
{} (¢) Forthe connector (on the seat belt pretensioner side) be-

tween the seat belt pretensioner (RH) and the airbag sen-
sor assembly, measure the voltage between PR+ and

ON body ground.
OK:
Voltage: 0 V

@
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Check airbag sensor assembly.

P/T Squib (RH)

—

Check Connector

H05167
H02139
ABO0118 ABO119
R13006 H01081

Airbag
[D Sensor
Assembly
ACC ON
@ or
DTC B0133/62

H06839

PREPARATION:

LAND CRUISER (W/G)
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(@)
(b)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK.

Disconnect negative (-) terminal cable from the battery,
and wait at least for 90 seconds.

Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
Using a service wire, connect PR+ and PR- of the con-
nector (on the seat belt pretensioner side) between the
seat belt pretensioner (RH) and the airbag sensor assem-
bly.

Connect negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See step 5 on page DI-447)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.

(d) Turnignition switchto ACC or ON, and waitatleastfor 20

seconds.
(e) Check DTC.
(See page DI-447)
OK:
DTCBO0 133/62is notoutput.
HINT:
Codesotherthancode B0 133/62 may be output atthistime, but

they are not relevant to this check.

e )

Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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4 | Check P/T squib (RH).

P/T Squib (RH) Aitbag

4 m m :| Sensor

Assembly

Check Connector DTC B0133/62

H05168
AB0118 AB0119
R13006 HO01081 H06840

PREPARATION:

(@)
(b)

(©
(d)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK.

Disconnect negative (-) terminal cable from the battery,
and wait at least for 90 seconds.

Connect the seat belt pretensioner (RH) connector.
Connect negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

OK:

HINT:

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See step 5 on page DI-447)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Check DTC.

(See page DI-447)

DTCBO0 133/62is notoutput.

Codesotherthancode B0 133/62 may be output atthistime, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace seat belt pretensioner (RH).

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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5 Check floor wire harness.

PREPARATION:

Floor Wire Harness

Cﬂ%»i‘ﬂﬂiiﬂ

P/T Squib (RH) %

Airbag
Sensor
Assembly

H05169
ABO119
H02137

H06841

OK

Disconnect the floor wire harness connector on the airbag sen-
sorassembly side.

CHECK:

For the connector (on the floor wire harness side) between the
seat belt pretensioner and the floor wire harness, measure the
voltage between PR+ and body ground.

OK:

Voltage: 0 V

NG?

pair or replace harness or connector be-

harness.

tween airbag sensor assembly and floor wire

6 | Check harness between airbag sensor assembly and floor wire harness.

CHECK:

Floor Wire Harness

=0 [0 0=

P/T Squib (RH)
@ON

H05170 —
AB0119 H02146

Airbag
:I Sensor
Assembly

H06842

OK

For the connector (on the floor wire harness side) between the
airbag sensorassembly andthe floor wire harness, measure
the voltage between PR+ and body ground.

OK:

Voltage: 0 V

-

harness.

Repair or replace harness or connector be-
tween airbag sensor assembly and floor wire

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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